Washington statutes.
RCW 36.34.005

Establishment of comprehensive procedures for management of county property authorized—Exemption from chapter.

Pursuant to public notice and hearing, any county may establish comprehensive procedures for the management of county property consistent with the public interest and counties establishing such procedures shall be exempt from the provisions of chapter 36.34 RCW: PROVIDED, That all counties shall retain all powers now or hereafter granted by chapter 36.34 RCW.

[ 1973 1st ex.s. c 196 s 1.]